Nevada, session 83, AB84.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 403.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
403.490 1. To perform any work or construct any
superstructure under this chapter wherein an expenditure of
$100,000 or more may be necessary, the board of county highway
commissioners shall cause definite plans of such work or
superstructure to be made, estimates of the amount of work to be
done and the probable cost thereof, together with a copy of the
specifications thereof.
2. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 3,] subsections
3 and 4, upon receipt of the plans, estimates and specifications for a
project for which the estimated cost is $100,000 or more, the board
of county highway commissioners shall advertise for bids and let
contracts in the manner prescribed by chapter 332 or 338 of NRS, as
applicable.
3. If the board of county highway commissioners advertises
for bids pursuant to subsection 2 not less than two times and does
not receive any bid for the project, the project may be performed
by county employees or through the employment of day labor
under the supervision of the board and by the use of its own
machinery, tools and other equipment without letting contracts
pursuant to subsection 2.
4. In a county whose population is less than 52,000, if the
estimated cost of a project is $100,000 or more but less than
[$250,000,] $547,570, as adjusted pursuant to this subsection, the
board of county highway commissioners may hold a hearing to
determine, by majority vote of the board, if the project can be
performed by county employees or through the employment of day
labor under the supervision of the board and by the use of its own
machinery, tools and other equipment without advertising for bids
and letting contracts pursuant to subsection 2. Using 2011 as the
base year, the maximum amount of the estimated cost of a project
for which a hearing may be held pursuant to this subsection must
be adjusted for each fiscal year using the following formula:
(a) Subtract the amount of the highway construction index for
the first quarter of the base year from the amount of the highway
construction index for the last quarter of the calendar year
immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the adjustment is
made;
(b) Divide the difference calculated pursuant to paragraph (a)
by the amount of the highway construction index for the first
quarter of the base year;
-
*AB84*

– 3 –
(c) Add one to the quotient calculated pursuant to paragraph
(b); and
(d) Multiply the sum calculated pursuant to paragraph (c) by
$250,000.
5. Notice for [such] a hearing held pursuant to subsection 4
must be provided not less than 15 days before the date of the hearing
and must be published pursuant to the provisions of NRS 238.010 to
238.080, inclusive. The board shall provide, in the notice and at
least 15 days before the hearing at the office of the board and at the
place of the hearing, the following information, without limitation:
(a) A list of:
(1) All county employees, if any, including supervisors, who
will perform the work, including, without limitation, the
classification of each employee and an estimate of the direct and
indirect costs of the labor;
(2) The number of day laborers, if any, that will be employed
to perform the work; and
(3) All machinery, tools and other equipment of the county to
be used on the project.
(b) An estimate of:
(1) The direct and indirect costs of the labor of the county
employees who will perform the work, if any;
(2) The direct and indirect costs of the labor of any day
laborers who will be employed to perform the work pursuant to
chapter 338 of NRS;
(3) The cost of any administrative support that will be
required for the performance of the work;
(4) The total cost of the project, including, without
limitation, the fair market value or, if available, the actual cost of all
materials, supplies, equipment and labor necessary for the project;
and
(5) The amount of savings to be realized by having county
employees or day laborers perform the work.
[4.] 6. In cases of emergency the board of county highway
commissioners may let contracts for repairs in the manner
prescribed by chapter 332 of NRS.
[5.] 7. Nothing in this section shall prevent any county from
opening, building, improving or repairing any public road or
highway in the county through the work of county employees or the
employment of day labor, under the supervision of the board of
county highway commissioners and by the use of its own
machinery, tools and other equipment, without letting contracts to
the lowest responsible bidder, if the probable cost of the work does
not exceed $100,000.
-
*AB84*

– 4 –
8. For the purposes of this section, “highway construction
index” means the National Highway Construction Cost Index, as
published by the United States Department of Transportation or, if
that index ceases to be published by the United States Department
of Transportation, the published index that most closely resembles
that index, as determined by the board of county highway
commissioners.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB84*